Utah statutes.
19-3-318.   No limitation of liability regarding businesses involved in high
level radioactive waste.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Controlling interest" means:
(i)  the direct or indirect possession of the power to direct or cause the
direction of the management and policies of an organization, whether through
the ownership of voting interests, by contract, or otherwise; or
(ii)  the direct or indirect possession of a 10% or greater equity interest in
an organization.
(b)  "Equity interest holder" means a shareholder, member, partner, limited
partner, trust beneficiary, or other person whose interest in an organization:
(i)  is in the nature of an ownership interest;
(ii)  entitles the person to participate in the profits and losses of the
organization; or
(iii)  is otherwise of a type generally considered to be an equity interest.
(c)  "Organization" means a corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, joint
venture, consortium, association, trust, or other entity formed to undertake
an enterprise or activity, whether or not for profit.
(d)  "Parent organization" means an organization with a controlling interest
in another organization.
(e) (i)  "Subject activity" means:
(A)  to arrange for or engage in the transportation or transfer of high level
nuclear waste or greater than class C radioactive waste to or from a storage
facility in the state; or
(B)  to arrange for or engage in the operation or maintenance of a storage
facility or a transfer facility for that waste.
(ii)  "Subject activity" does not include the transportation of high level
nuclear waste or greater than class C radioactive waste by a class I railroad
that was doing business in the state as a common or contract carrier by rail
prior to January 1, 1999.
(f)  "Subsidiary organization" means an organization in which a parent
organization has a controlling interest.
(2) (a)  The Legislature enacts this section because of the state's compelling
interest in the transportation, transfer, and storage of high level nuclear
waste and greater than class C radioactive waste in this state.  Legislative
intent supporting this section is further described in Section 19-3-302.
(b)  Limited liability for equity interest holders is a privilege, not a
right, under the law and is meant to benefit the state and its citizens.  An
organization engaging in subject activities has significant potential to
affect the health, welfare, or best interests of the state and should not have
limited liability for its equity interest holders.  To shield equity interest
holders from the debts and obligations of an organization engaged in subject
activities would have the effect of attracting capital to enterprises whose
goals are contrary to the state's interests.
(c)  This section has the intent of revoking any and all statutory and common
law grants of limited liability for an equity interest holder of an
organization that chooses to engage in a subject activity in this state.
(d)  This section shall be interpreted liberally to allow the greatest
possible lawful recourse against an equity interest holder of an organization
engaged in a subject activity in this state for the debts and liabilities of
that organization.
(e)  This section does not reduce or affect any liability limitation otherwise
granted to an organization by Utah law if that organization is not engaged in
a subject activity in this state.
(3)  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if a domestic or foreign
organization engages in a subject activity in this state, no equity interest
holder of that organization enjoys any shield or limitation of liability for
the acts, omissions, debts, and obligations of the organization incurred in
this state.  Each equity interest holder of the organization is strictly and
jointly and severally liable for all these obligations.
(4)  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, each officer and director of an
organization engaged in a subject activity in this state is individually
liable for the acts, omissions, debts, and obligations of the organization
incurred in this state.
(5) (a)  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if a subsidiary organization
is engaged in a subject activity in this state, then each parent organization
of the subsidiary is also considered to be engaged in a subject activity in
this state.  Each parent organization's equity interest holders and officers
and directors are subject to this section to the same degree as the
subsidiary's equity interest holders and officers and directors.
(b)  Subsection (5)(a) applies regardless of the number of parent
organizations through which the controlling interest passes in the
relationship between the subsidiary and the ultimate parent organization that
controls the subsidiary.
(6)  This section does not excuse or modify the requirements imposed upon an
applicant for a license by Subsection 19-3-306(9).
